District of Columbia statutes.
16-4601.06

Priority.

If a question of existence or exercise of jurisdiction under this chapter is raised in a child-custody proceeding, the question, upon request of a party, must be given priority on the calendar and handled expeditiously.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 107 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).